Massachusetts, session 194th, H3801.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 2 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2014 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by inserting after the words “park board”, in line 157, the following words:- or
federally recognized Native American tribe.
of 1